Utah statutes.
7-9-11.   Bylaws and amendments to be approved.
(1)  A credit union may not receive payments on shares, deposits, or
certificates, or make any loans or other transactions, until its bylaws have
been approved in writing by the commissioner.
(2)  An amendment to a credit union's bylaws does not become operative until
the amendment to the bylaws is approved by the commissioner.
(3) (a)  If the amendment to the bylaws of a credit union expands the field of
membership of a credit union as described in Subsection 7-9-52(1), the
commissioner's approval of the amendment is subject to Section 7-9-52.
(b)  If the bylaws or an amendment to the bylaws of a credit union adds an
association to the field of membership of the credit union, the commissioner
may require that the credit union provide written confirmation from the
association that the association has agreed to be served by the credit union.
